Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202060-4,118.05
Age requirements; license issued;
when.

(1) No operator's license referred to in section 60-4,118
shall, under any circumstances, be issued to any person who has not attained
the age of seventeen years.

(2) No operator's license shall be issued to a person under eighteen
years of age applying for an operator's license under section 60-4,118 unless
such person:

(a) Has possessed a valid provisional operator's permit for at least
a twelve-month period beginning on the date of issuance of such person's provisional
operator's permit; and

(b) Has not accumulated three or more points pursuant to section 60-4,182
during the twelve-month period immediately preceding the date of the application
for the operator's license.

(3) The department may waive the written examination and the driving
test required under section 60-4,118 for any person seventeen to twenty-one
years of age applying for his or her initial operator's license if he or she
has been issued a provisional operator's permit. The department shall not
waive the written examination and the driving test required under this section
if the person is applying for a CLP-commercial
learner's permit or commercial driver's license or if the operator's license being
applied for contains a class or endorsement which is different from the class
or endorsement of the provisional operator's permit.

Laws
2001, LB 38, § 31;

Laws 2008, LB911, § 14;

Laws 2014, LB983, § 19.